New Jersey, session 222, A4068.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. (1) For privilege periods beginning on or after January 1 next following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and subject to the limitations of subsection e. of this section, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), as calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for the qualified construction costs incurred by the taxpayer during the privilege period for the completion of a qualified construction project at the site of an abandoned commercial building in the State. (2) The amount of the credit authorized pursuant to this section shall not exceed the lesser of: (a) 25 percent of the total qualified construction costs incurred by the taxpayer during the privilege period; or (b) $1,000,000. b.  To qualify for the tax credit allowed pursuant to this section, a taxpayer shall apply to the division for a certification that provides: (1) that the qualified construction project meets the requirements of this section; and (2) the amount of the tax credit calculated pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.  The application shall demonstrate that the taxpayer completed the qualified construction project before applying for the tax credit provided in this section.  The application shall include a receipt demonstrating the qualified construction costs incurred by the taxpayer and any other information determined relevant by the division. Upon certification, the division shall submit a copy of the certification to the taxpayer. d.  The director shall prescribe the order of priority of the application of the tax credit allowed pursuant to this section, and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for the privilege period. The amount of the credit applied pursuant to this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) shall not reduce a taxpayer's tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5).  The amount of the tax credit otherwise allowable under this section which cannot be applied for the privilege period due to the limitations of this subsection or under other provisions of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.) may be carried forward, if necessary, to the seven privilege periods following the privilege period for which the tax credit was allowed. e.  The value of tax credits provided by the director pursuant to this section and pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not exceed a cumulative total of $5 million f.  The division shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this section. g.  No later than one year after the expiration date of the tax credits provided pursuant to this section, the division shall prepare and submit to the Governor, the State Treasurer, and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a report that, at a minimum, summarizes the effectiveness of the tax credit in incentivizing the replacement of abandoned commercial buildings with newly constructed commercial buildings. h.  As used in this section: Commercial building means a building of at least 100,000 square feet that is used for commercial purposes. Director means Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. Division means the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. Qualified construction costs means costs incurred in connection with the completion of a qualified construction project. Qualified construction project means any of the following: the demolition of an abandoned commercial building; the construction of a new commercial building at the demolition site of an abandoned commercial building; the removal of debris from the demolition site of an abandoned commercial building; the remediation of a demolition site; or the repurposing of an abandoned commercial building. Remediation means the investigation, analysis, planning, monitoring, acquisition, removal, containment, remediation, construction, or improvement of any real property or building necessary or desirable for the cleanup of actual, potential, or perceived environmental contamination or pollution, including without limitation, water pollution, air pollution, pollution caused by solid waste disposal, thermal pollution, radiation contamination, or other general environmental contamination or pollution which is or may become injurious to the environment or to the public health, safety, or welfare. 2.  a. (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the effective date of P.L.     , c.     (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and subject to the limitations of subsection e. of this section, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., as calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for any qualified construction costs incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year for the completion of a qualified construction project at the site of an abandoned commercial building in the State. (2) The amount of the credit authorized pursuant to this section shall not exceed the lesser of:  (a) 25 percent of the total qualified construction costs incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year; or (b) $1,000,000. b.  To qualify for the tax credit allowed pursuant to this section, a taxpayer shall apply to the division for a certification that provides: (1) that the qualified construction project meets the requirements of this section; and (2) the amount of the tax credit calculated pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.  The application shall demonstrate that the taxpayer completed the qualified construction project before applying for the tax credit provided in this section.  The application shall include a receipt demonstrating the qualified construction costs incurred by the taxpayer and any other information determined relevant by the division. Upon certification, the division shall submit a copy of the certification to the taxpayer. d.  The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section, and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year, shall be as prescribed by the director.  The amount of the credit applied under this section against the New Jersey gross income tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year, when taken together with any other payments, credits, deductions, and adjustments allowed by law, shall not reduce a taxpayer's tax liability to an amount less than zero.  The amount of the tax credit otherwise allowable under this section which cannot be applied for the taxable year due to the limitations of this section or other provisions of N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. may be carried forward, if necessary, to the seven taxable years following the taxable year for which the tax credit was allowed. e.  The value of tax credits provided by the director pursuant to this section and pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not exceed a cumulative total of $5 million. f.  The division shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this section. g.  No later than one year after the expiration date of the tax credits provided pursuant to this section, the division shall prepare and submit to the Governor, the State Treasurer, and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a report that, at a minimum, summarizes the effectiveness of the tax credit in incentivizing the replacement of abandoned commercial buildings with newly constructed commercial buildings. h.  As used in this section: Commercial building means a building of at least 100,000 square feet that is used for commercial purposes. Director means Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. Division means the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. Qualified construction costs means costs incurred in connection with the completion of a qualified construction project. Qualified construction project means any of the following: the demolition of an abandoned commercial building; the construction of a new commercial building at the demolition site of an abandoned commercial building; the removal of debris from the demolition site of an abandoned commercial building; the remediation of a demolition site; or the repurposing of an abandoned commercial building. Remediation means the investigation, analysis, planning, monitoring, acquisition, removal, containment, remediation, construction, or improvement of any real property or building necessary or desirable for the cleanup of actual, potential, or perceived environmental contamination or pollution, including without limitation, water pollution, air pollution, pollution caused by solid waste disposal, thermal pollution, radiation contamination, or other general environmental contamination or pollution which is or may become injurious to the environment or to the public health, safety, or welfare. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.